Spell/share/myspell/dicts/el_GR.dic
αγαλματένιος/IQdejkn
αδέρφωνα/Neg
αδιπλασίαστης/INX
ακατατόπιστος/IQXdejkn
ακινητοποίητος/IQXdejkn
ακταιωρός/GXa
ανακριτικός/FGJKLMXa
αναξιόλογος/IQXdejkn
αναπαυτικός/FGHJKLMXa
αναπόσπαστης/INX
ανεξόφλητος/IQXdejkn
αντιδανείσω/GPTYabjm
αντιδικώ/JM
αντιμολυσματική/LWi
αντιπαθώ/HIJM
αντιποιητικός/FGJKLMXa
αντωνυμικός/FGJKLMXa
απαλλάσσω/JRSTVWYckm
απαρτίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
απαυτώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
απεγνωσμένος/HIQXdejkn
απεικάζω/RSVWck
απειρότεχνος/IQXdejkn
απελευθερωμένος/QXdekn
αποβλακώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
αποδεκατισμός/a
αποικιζόμουν/YZhm
αποκλείσω/GPTYabjm
αποστηθιζόμουν/YZhm
αρχινίσω/GPTYabjm
αυτόνομος/IQXdejkn
αφτί/MOUf
βαίνω/JTYm
βαλτώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
βασικής/HLXi
βιολί/MOUf
βιοτική/ALWi
βομβώ/M
βράδυνα/Neg
βρυχηθμός/LMa
βυσματώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
γαλανός/FGJKLMXa
γανώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
γελαστός/FGJKLMXa
γελώ/FGKMOPQRUVabim
γεμίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
γενοβέζικης/INX
γιασεμένιος/IQdejkn
γιατρεύω/RSTVWckm
γιαχνιστός/FGJKLMXa
γινόντουσαν/BCDE
γκάριζα/Neg
γκρεμίζεστε/BC
γλυκύφωνος/IQXdejkn
γραφόσασταν/BCDE
δέξου/C
δαδί/MOf
δειλινός/FGJKLMXa
δεξιοσύνη/A
διάταξή/W
διαγράψω/PTYbjm
διαλλακτικός/FGHJKXa
διαταραζόμουν/YZhm
δικαζόμουν/BDYZhm
δικτυωνόμουν/YZhm
διπλωματικός/FGJKLMXa
δουλευόμουν/BEYZhm
δροσίζεται/D
δροσερός/FGJKLMXa
εβδομηντάρης/Ifg
ειρωνικής/HLXi
εισάγω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
εκατοστόμετρο/IQd
εκθέτω/JRSTVWYckm
εκκαθαρίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
εκπαιδευτικός/FGJKLMXa
εκπωματίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
εμπαικτικός/FGJKLMXa
εναπόθεση/K
ενσαρκώσω/GPTYabjm
εξαπλώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
εξασέλιδος/IQXdejkn
εξετάζω/JPRSTVWYabckm
εξεταστική/LWi
εξόπλιζα/Neg
επαναστατώ/JKM
επανεορταζόμουν/YZhm
επαυξάνω/JRSTVWYckm
επενεργεί/U
επιβραδυνόμενος/QXdjkn
επιδείχνω/RSVWckm
επιθανάτιος/IQdejkn
επιμερίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
επιμηκύνω/JRSTVWYckm
επιπλοκή/Li
επιστρέψω/GPTYajm
ευνούχιζα/Neg
ευτραφής/HLXi
ζαρώνονταν/CD
ζωντάνευε/B
ηθμός/GJKa
ηλεκτρομηχανολογικός/FGJLXa
θλίψη/GKP
ιψενικός/FGJKLMXa
κίνησαν/E
καβγατζίδικος/IQXdejkn
κακοποιός/FGKLMa
καλησπερίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
καλοδούλευτος/IQXdejkn
καλοσυνηθίσω/GPTYabjm
καλούνταν/C
καλωσοριζόμουν/YZhm
κανί/O
καπνεμπορικός/FGJKLMXa
κατάλληλης/AINX
κατηφορίσω/GPTYabjm
κατοικίδιος/IQdejkn
καυλί/MOf
κεφαλλονίτικης/INX
κλειδί/MOUf
κλειδώσω/GPTYabjm
κλημάτινης/INX
κλιματικός/FGJKLMXa
κοιμίσω/CGPTYabjm
κορδώνεστε/E
κορμός/GKLMOa
κουβεντιαζόντουσαν/BE
κουραζόμουν/DEYZhm
κουτί/MOUf
κοχλιώνονταν/C
κυλώ/FMOPRUWXYZabdim
κυματικός/FGJKLMXa
λακτίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
λελογισμένος/HIQXen
λεπτοτεχνικός/FGJKLMXa
λογιαζόντουσαν/E
λουσάρω/RSVWck
λυόμασταν/CD
μάρτυρος/AI
μέρισα/DENeg
μίξη/GKP
μαγαρίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
μαλακός/FGJKLMOXa
μαλλί/MOUf
μαντρώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
μασονικός/FGJKLMXa
ματώνονται/BD
μαύρος/IQXdejkn
μεσιτική/LWi
μεταλαμπαδευόμουν/YZhm
μεταξοκλωστικός/FGJKLMXa
μετρικός/EFGJKLMXa
μηνυτήριος/IQdejkn
μοναδικότητά/G
μουσαφίρης/Xf
μπάνικης/INX
νεανικός/FGJKLMXa
νοιάζονταν/E
νοικοκυρευόμουν/YZhm
ντοκουμέντο/IQd
ξαναγεννώ/RUZ
ξεβρομίσω/GPTYabjm
ξεκινώ/FGKMOPim
ξεσπιτώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
ξεσφραγιζόμουν/YZhm
ξεχερσώσω/GPTYabjm
ξηραινόντουσαν/CD
ξυλουργείο/Id
ξυλώδη/GKN
οθωνικός/FGJKLMXa
ορμίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
οσπριοειδή/LWi
παλαμικός/FGJKLMXa
παραγγέλλω/JRSTVWckm
παρατεντώνω/GRSVWck
παρορμητική/LWi
παροτρύνω/JRSTVWYackm
πατήθηκε/AD
πατήσουν/AB
πατρικής/HLXi
πατώ/FGIJKMOPUWimn
πεδικλωνόμουν/YZhm
πετάλωνα/Neg
πετσί/MOf
πλάθονταν/B
πρεσβυωπικός/FGJKLMXa
προαποφασίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
προετοιμαστώ/JKMn
προσανατολισμός/GKLMa
προσθετέος/IQdejkn
πτήση/GKPY
πύρωσα/Neg
σαφούς/A
σιγαλής/LOXi
σκαμπιλίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
σκεπαζόντουσαν/CD
σκυλί/MOUf
σουμερικός/FGJKLMXa
σπαργανώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
στενοχωρώ/JMRSUWZl
στιλβώνονταν/C
στολίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
στριβόμουν/BYZhm
στριμωχνόμουν/EYZhm
στριφώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
στροφαλοφόρος/IQdejkn
συγκαλύπτω/RSTVWYackm
συγκεκαλυμμένος/HIQXn
συμμαζώνω/RSVWck
συμπληρωματικής/HLXi
συναλλαγματικός/FGJKLMXa
συντέμνω/RSTVWckm
σφαλισμένος/AIQXdjkn
σχολιάσω/PTYabjm
τήκεσαι/D
ταρατσώσω/GPTYabjm
τεκμηριώνω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
τεμπέλης/IXfgj
τινασσόμασταν/C
τιποτένια/Neh
τρίκλωνος/IQXdejkn
τριβολίσω/GPTYabjm
τυπωτικός/FGJKLMXa
υπήνεμης/INX
υπογραμμίσω/GPTYabjm
υπομνηματικός/FGJKLMXa
υψηλότοκης/INX
φαγκρί/O
φιλοκαλία/A
φορώ/FGIMOPUWZim
φυλάσσομαι/E
χαράσσω/JRSTVWYckm
χαρώ/FGIJKMTn
χειρωνακτικός/FGHJKLMXa
χρωματίζονταν/BC
χωνόντουσαν/CDE
ψήνω/PRSTVWYcekm
ωστικός/FGJKLMXa
